Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1738.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; attorney general; Coconino county; juvenile services; exemption A. The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the attorney general to distribute to Coconino county for the purpose of constructing and purchasing equipment for a new juvenile court services facility and converting the existing juvenile detention center into a detox, sobriety and crisis recovery center. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.